Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-512
Perpetual care funds; perpetual special care trusts; acquisition of property under; validity.

No payment, gift, grant, bequest, or other contribution for such purpose shall be deemed to be invalid by reason of any indefiniteness or uncertainty of the persons designated as beneficiaries in the instruments creating such funds, nor shall any of such funds or any contribution thereto be invalidated as violating any rule against perpetuities or suspension of the power of alienation of title to property.

Laws 1941, c. 18, § 1, p. 105;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 13-505;

R.S.1943, § 12-512.

Bequest for maintenance of cemetery was valid. Tetschner v. Cram, 157 Neb. 734, 61 N.W.2d 378 (1953).